Nebraska, session 109, LB200.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property
taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the
extent used or being developed for use by the state or governmental
subdivision for a public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means
(A) property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision
or (B) property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental
subdivision in that it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired
under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument
which provides for transfer of legal title to the property to the state
or a governmental subdivision upon payment of all amounts due thereunder.
If the property to be beneficially owned by a governmental subdivision
has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold amount or will be
used as the site of a public building with a total estimated construction
cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such property shall qualify
for an exemption under this section only if the question of acquiring
such property or constructing such public building has been submitted at
a primary, general, or special election held within the governmental
subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the governmental
subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount means the
greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general
operation of government, public education, public safety, transportation,
public works, civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare,
-2-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
developments by a public housing authority, parks, culture, recreation,
community development, and cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the
duties and responsibilities conferred by law with or without
consideration. Public purpose does not include leasing of property to a
private party unless the lease of the property is at fair market value
for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing authority to
low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the authority's
public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions
which is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but
upon which a payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue,
and emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services to all governmental units providing such services to the
property. Except as provided in Article VIII, section 11, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be based on
the proportionate share of the cost of providing public safety, rescue,
or emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services unless a general policy is adopted by the governing body of the
governmental subdivision providing such services which provides for a
different method of determining the amount of the payment in lieu of
taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by
majority vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such
ordinance or resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable
contribution for the cost of providing such services to the exempt
property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or
cemetery organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of
any such educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization,
-3-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
and used exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
purposes, when such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain
or profit to either the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic
liquors for more than twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an
organization which discriminates in membership or employment based on
race, color, or national origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated
exclusively for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic
instruction in academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting
students through services relating to the origination, processing, or
guarantying of federally reinsured student loans for higher education,
(II) a museum or historical society operated exclusively for the benefit
and education of the public, or (III) a nonprofit organization that owns
or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of
the public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal
benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to
44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to any skilled nursing facility as defined in
section 71-429, nursing facility as defined in section 71-424, or
assisted-living facility as defined in section 71-5903 that provides
housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption amount for
such property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that would
otherwise be due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average
percentage of occupied beds in the facility provided to medicaid
beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a
-4-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
charitable organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance
at an educational institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational
institution as approved student housing, except that the exemption shall
only apply to the commons area of such building, including any common
rooms and cooking and eating facilities; and
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for
financial gain or profit to either the owner or user.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental
trees planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the
valuation of land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible
personal property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from
property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be
registered for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt
from payment of property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the
personal property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business
inventory includes personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain only if the personal
property is of a type which in the ordinary course of business is leased
or rented thirty days or less and may be returned at the option of the
lessee or renter at any time and the personal property is of a type which
would be considered household goods or personal effects if owned by an
individual. All other personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain shall not be
considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
-5-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage
Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source shall be exempt
from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property.
Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the
fuel source shall be exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable
tangible personal property if such depreciable tangible personal property
was installed on or after January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity
of one hundred kilowatts or more. Depreciable tangible personal property
used directly in the generation of electricity using wind, solar,
biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source includes, but is not limited
to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers, solar panels, trackers,
generating equipment, transmission components, substations, supporting
structures or racks, inverters, and other system components such as
wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up transformers.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person
operating a data center located in this state, that is assembled,
engineered, processed, fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or
incorporated into other tangible personal property, both in component
form or that of an assembled product, for the purpose of subsequent use
at a physical location outside this state by the person operating a data
center shall be exempt from the personal property tax. Such exemption
extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over
tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
For purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting
equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are
designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data
-6-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities or
interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply,
communication and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and
fire suppression, and any building housing the foregoing.
(11) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, each person
who owns property required to be reported to the county assessor under
section 77-1201 shall be allowed an exemption amount as provided in the
Personal Property Tax Relief Act. For tax years after prior to tax year
2024 2020, each person who owns property required to be valued by the
state as provided in section 77-601, 77-682, 77-801, or 77-1248 shall be
allowed a compensating exemption factor as provided in the Personal
Property Tax Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal
property tax if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the
federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized
to provide end-users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least
one hundred megabits per second for downloading and at least one hundred
megabits per second for uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to
begin. If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this
subsection, the county assessor shall approve the application within
thirty calendar days after receiving the application. The application
shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
-7-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications
service as defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47
U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet
access as defined in section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom
Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to
provide broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited
to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and
cases, power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, and other general central office or headend
equipment, such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, or equipment used
in successor technologies, including items used to monitor, test,
maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment, machinery,
software, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories, or other
infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide broadband
communications service. Machinery or equipment used to produce broadband
communications service does not include personal consumer electronics,
including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 2. Section 77-693, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-693 (1) The Property Tax Administrator in determining the taxable
value of railroads and car lines shall determine the following ratios
involving railroad and car line property and commercial and industrial
property:
(a) The ratio of the taxable value of all commercial and industrial
personal property in the state actually subjected to property tax divided
-8-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
by the market value of all commercial and industrial personal property in
the state;
(b) The ratio of the taxable value of all commercial and industrial
real property in the state actually subjected to property tax divided by
the market value of all commercial and industrial real property in the
state;
(c) The ratio of the taxable value of railroad personal property to
the market value of railroad personal property. The numerator of the
ratio shall be the taxable value of railroad personal property. The
denominator of the ratio shall be the railroad system value allocated to
Nebraska and multiplied by a factor representing the net book value of
rail transportation personal property divided by the net book value of
total rail transportation property;
(d) The ratio of the taxable value of railroad real property to the
market value of railroad real property. The numerator of the ratio shall
be the taxable value of railroad real property. The denominator of the
ratio shall be the railroad system value allocated to Nebraska and
multiplied by a factor representing the net book value of rail
transportation real property divided by the net book value of total rail
transportation property; and
(e) Similar calculations shall be made for car line taxable
properties.
(2) If the ratio of the taxable value of railroad and car line
personal or real property exceeds the ratio of the comparable taxable
commercial and industrial property by more than five percent, the
Property Tax Administrator may adjust the value of such railroad and car
line property to the percentage of the comparable taxable commercial and
industrial property pursuant to federal statute or Nebraska federal court
decisions applicable thereto.
(3) For purposes of this section, commercial and industrial property
shall mean all real and personal property which is devoted to commercial
-9-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
or industrial use other than rail transportation property and land used
primarily for agricultural purposes.
(4) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, after the
adjustment made pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
Property Tax Administrator shall multiply the value of the tangible
personal property of each railroad and car line by the compensating
exemption factor calculated in section 77-1238.
Sec. 3. Section 77-801, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-801 (1) All public service entities shall, on or before April 15
of each year, furnish a statement specifying such information as may be
required by the Property Tax Administrator on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner to determine and distribute the entity's total taxable value
including the franchise value. All information reported by the public
service entities, not available from any other public source, and any
memorandum thereof shall be confidential and available to taxing
officials only. For good cause shown, the Property Tax Administrator may
allow an extension of time in which to file such statement. Such
extension shall not exceed fifteen days after April 15.
(2) The returns of public service entities shall not be held to be
conclusive as to the taxable value of the property, but the Property Tax
Administrator shall, from all the information which he or she is able to
obtain, find the taxable value of all such property, including tangible
property and franchises, and shall assess such property on the same basis
as other property is required to be assessed.
(3) The county assessor shall assess all nonoperating property of
any public service entity. A public service entity operating within the
State of Nebraska shall, on or before January 1 of each year, report to
the county assessor of each county in which it has situs all nonoperating
property belonging to such entity which is not subject to assessment and
assessed by the Property Tax Administrator under section 77-802.
-10-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
(4) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, the Property
Tax Administrator shall multiply the value of the tangible personal
property of each public service entity by the compensating exemption
factor calculated in section 77-1238.
Sec. 4. Section 77-1238, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1238 (1) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, every
person who is required to list his or her taxable tangible personal
property as defined in section 77-105, as required under section 77-1229,
shall receive an exemption from taxation for the first ten thousand
dollars of valuation of his or her tangible personal property in each tax
district as defined in section 77-127 in which a personal property return
is required to be filed. Failure to report tangible personal property on
the personal property return required by section 77-1229 shall result in
a forfeiture of the exemption for any tangible personal property not
timely reported for that year.
(2) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, the Property
Tax Administrator shall reduce the value of the tangible personal
property owned by each railroad, car line company, public service entity,
and air carrier by a compensating exemption factor to reflect the
exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this section for all other
personal property taxpayers. The compensating exemption factor is
calculated by multiplying the value of the tangible personal property of
the railroad, car line company, public service entity, or air carrier by
a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount of locally
assessed tangible personal property that is actually subjected to
property tax after the exemption allowed in subsection (1) of this
section, and the denominator of which is the net book value of locally
assessed tangible personal property prior to the exemptions allowed in
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 5. Section 77-1239, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-11-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
77-1239 (1) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020,
reimbursement to taxing subdivisions for tax revenue that will be lost
because of the personal property tax exemptions allowed in subsection (1)
of section 77-1238 shall be as provided in this subsection. The county
assessor and county treasurer shall, on or before November 30 of each
year, certify to the Tax Commissioner, on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner, the total tax revenue that will be lost to all taxing
subdivisions within his or her county from taxes levied and assessed in
that year because of the personal property tax exemptions allowed in
subsection (1) of section 77-1238. The county assessor and county
treasurer may amend the certification to show any change or correction in
the total tax revenue that will be lost until May 30 of the next
succeeding year. The Tax Commissioner shall, on or before January 1 next
following the certification, notify the Director of Administrative
Services of the amount so certified to be reimbursed by the state.
Reimbursement of the tax revenue lost shall be made to each county
according to the certification and shall be distributed in two
approximately equal installments on the last business day of February and
the last business day of June. The State Treasurer shall, on the business
day preceding the last business day of February and the last business day
of June, notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of
funds available in the General Fund to pay the reimbursement. The
Director of Administrative Services shall, on the last business day of
February and the last business day of June, draw warrants against funds
appropriated. Out of the amount received, the county treasurer shall
distribute to each of the taxing subdivisions within his or her county
the full tax revenue lost by each subdivision, except that one percent of
such amount shall be deposited in the county general fund.
(2) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, reimbursement
to taxing subdivisions for tax revenue that will be lost because of the
-12-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
compensating exemption factor in subsection (2) of section 77-1238 shall
be as provided in this subsection. The Property Tax Administrator shall
establish the average tax rate that will be used for purposes of
reimbursing taxing subdivisions pursuant to this subsection. The average
tax rate shall be equal to the total property taxes levied in the state
divided by the total taxable value of all taxable property in the state
as certified pursuant to section 77-1613.01. The total valuation that
will be lost to all taxing subdivisions within each county because of the
compensating exemption factor in subsection (2) of section 77-1238,
multiplied by the average tax rate calculated pursuant to this
subsection, shall be the tax revenue to be reimbursed to the taxing
subdivisions by the state. Reimbursement of the tax revenue lost for
public service entities shall be made to each county according to the
certification and shall be distributed among the taxing subdivisions
within each county in the same proportion as all public service entity
taxes levied by the taxing subdivisions. Reimbursement of the tax revenue
lost for railroads shall be made to each county according to the
certification and shall be distributed among the taxing subdivisions
within each county in the same proportion as all railroad taxes levied by
taxing subdivisions. Reimbursement of the tax revenue lost for car line
companies shall be distributed in the same manner as the taxes collected
pursuant to section 77-684. Reimbursement of the tax revenue lost for air
carriers shall be distributed in the same manner as the taxes collected
pursuant to section 77-1250.
(3) Each taxing subdivision shall, in preparing its annual or
biennial budget, take into account the amounts to be received under this
section.
Sec. 6. Section 77-1248, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1248 (1) The Property Tax Administrator shall ascertain from the
reports made and from any other information obtained by him or her the
-13-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
taxable value of the flight equipment of air carriers and the proportion
allocated to this state for the purposes of taxation as provided in
section 77-1245.
(2)(a) In determining the taxable value of the flight equipment of
air carriers pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the Property Tax
Administrator shall determine the following ratios:
(i) The ratio of the taxable value of all commercial and industrial
depreciable tangible personal property in the state actually subjected to
property tax to the market value of all commercial and industrial
depreciable tangible personal property in the state; and
(ii) The ratio of the taxable value of flight equipment of air
carriers to the market value of flight equipment of air carriers.
(b) If the ratio of the taxable value of flight equipment of air
carriers exceeds the ratio of the taxable value of commercial and
industrial depreciable tangible personal property by more than five
percent, the Property Tax Administrator may adjust the value of such
flight equipment of air carriers to the percentage of the taxable
commercial and industrial depreciable tangible personal property pursuant
to federal law applicable to air carrier transportation property or
Nebraska federal court decisions applicable thereto.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, commercial and industrial
depreciable tangible personal property means all personal property which
is devoted to commercial or industrial use other than flight equipment of
air carriers.
(3) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, the Property
Tax Administrator shall multiply the valuation of each air carrier by the
compensating exemption factor calculated in section 77-1238.
Sec. 7. Section 77-1514, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1514 (1) The county assessor shall prepare an abstract of the
property assessment rolls of locally assessed real property of his or her
-14-

LB200 LB200
2025 2025
county on forms prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner. The
county assessor shall file the abstract with the Property Tax
Administrator on or before March 19, except beginning January 1, 2014, in
any county with a population of at least one hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census, the
real property abstract shall be filed on or before March 25. The abstract
shall show the taxable value of real property in the county as determined
by the county assessor and any other information as required by the
Property Tax Administrator. The Property Tax Administrator, upon written
request from the county assessor, may for good cause shown extend the
final filing due date for the abstract and the statutory deadlines
provided in section 77-5027. The Property Tax Administrator may extend
the statutory deadline in section 77-5028 for a county if the deadline is
extended for that county. Beginning January 1, 2014, in any county with a
population of at least one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants according
to the most recent federal decennial census, the county assessor shall
request an extension of the final filing due date by March 22.
(2) For tax years after prior to tax year 2024 2020, the county
assessor shall prepare an abstract of the property assessment rolls of
locally assessed personal property of his or her county on forms
prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner. The county assessor
shall electronically file the abstract with the Property Tax
Administrator on or before July 20.
Sec. 8. Original sections 77-202, 77-693, 77-801, 77-1238, 77-1239,
77-1248, and 77-1514, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-15-